Massachusetts, session 194th, S1936.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 8 through 14, inclusive, the words "90 per cent shall
be transferred to the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in section 2H; (ii) 5 per cent
shall be transferred to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund established in section 24 of chapter
32A; (iii) 5 per cent shall be transferred to the Commonwealth's Pension Liability Fund
established in subsection (e) of subdivision 8 of section 22 of chapter 32" and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- 70 per cent shall be transferred to the Commonwealth Stabilization
Fund established in section 2H; (ii) 10 per cent shall be transferred to the State Retiree Benefits
Trust Fund established in section 24 of chapter 32A; (iii) 10 per cent shall be transferred to the
Commonwealth's Pension Liability Fund established in subsection (e) of subdivision 8 of section
22 of chapter 32; and (iv) 10 per cent shall be transferred to the Disaster Relief and Resiliency
Trust Fund established in section 2HHHHHH of chapter 29 as inserted by section 58 of chapter
140 of the acts of 2024.
of 1